Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3511
Civil action authorized.

Upon violation of the Workplace Privacy Act, an aggrieved employee or applicant may, in addition to any other available remedy, institute a civil action within one year after the date of the alleged violation or the discovery of the alleged violation, whichever is later. The employee or applicant shall file an action directly in the district court of the county where such alleged violation occurred. The district court shall file and try such case as any other civil action, and any successful complainant shall be entitled to appropriate relief, including temporary or permanent injunctive relief, general and special damages, reasonable attorney's fees, and costs.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 11;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 85.